Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.325, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Established. A division in the Department of Public Safety to be known as the Division of Driver and Vehicle Services is hereby created, under the supervision and control of the director. new text begin The commissioner must appoint the director subject to the advice and consent of the senate. new text end The commissioner deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end place the director's position in the unclassified service if the position meets the criteria established in section 43A.08, subdivision 1a.